Utah statutes.
63J-1-703.   Selection of activities for review -- Coordination with audits.

The legislative auditor general shall consult with the Legislative Management Committee to determine the programs or activities to audit which will best assist the executive branch in preparing the in-depth budget and the Legislature in reviewing the in-depth budget for funding.  The scope of the audits shall be determined by the legislative auditor general based upon need, manpower considerations, and other audit priorities.  It is the intent of the Legislature that the legislative fiscal analyst and the legislative auditor general coordinate the in-depth budget reviews insofar as possible with the audits performed by the legislative auditor general.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 183, 2009 General Session

